District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.21

Personnel authority pilot programs.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, or any other provision of law or regulation, and consistent with § 1-204.22, the Mayor may implement pilot personnel programs in the areas of classification and compensation in the Department of Employment Services, the Department of Recreation and Parks and the Office of Personnel. Pilot programs may be established during any control period as defined in § 47-393, to help ensure successful implementation of the transformation of the District government workforce.

(b)

The Mayor may issue rules and regulations to implement these programs.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1121
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(n)(7), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-612.21.
Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the Department of Recreation and Parks shall be known as the Department of Parks and Recreation.

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Applicability of § 101(n) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(c) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(h), (l), (m), (n), (o)(2) through (5), (q), (r), (t), (u), (w), and (y) of the act shall apply as of October 21, 1998.